New Jersey, session 221, A3754.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to any other training or certification requirements prescribed by the Office of Emergency Telecommunications Services, each call taker or dispatcher employed by a PSAP shall be certified through the International Academies of Emergency Dispatch in Emergency Medical Dispatch and Emergency Fire Dispatch. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the thirteenth month next following the date of enactment, except that the Director of the Office of Emergency Telecommunications Services may take any anticipatory action in advance of that date as may be necessary for the timely implementation of this act.